Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5545XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5545XD (5) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
PROFESSIONAL PERMIT TO CARRY WEAPONS
Section 1. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons when
the person’s employment in a private investigation business
or private security business licensed under chapter 80A, or a
person’s employment as a peace officer, correctional officer,
judicial officer, county attorney, assistant county attorney,
attorney general, deputy attorney general, assistant attorney
general, security guard, bank messenger or other person
transporting property of a value requiring security, or in
police work, reasonably justifies that person going armed.
Sec. 2. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
(4) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons if the
person is a judicial officer, county attorney, or an assistant
county attorney, attorney general, deputy attorney general, or
assistant attorney general. An application for a permit by
an assistant county attorney must be approved by the county
attorney of each county in which the applicant serves prior to
a permit to carry weapons being issued. An application for
a permit by the attorney general or deputy attorney general
or by an assistant attorney general shall be delivered to
the sheriff for the county in which the applicant resides.
The sheriff of the issuing county may require the applicant
to complete a proficiency examination prior to issuing the
permit to carry weapons. The standards for a proficiency
examination for a judicial officer, county attorney, or
assistant county attorney, attorney general, deputy attorney
general, or assistant attorney general shall not exceed the
standards required of a peace officer. The applicant shall pay
the reasonable costs associated with completing a proficiency
examination.
Sec. 3. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, and d,
LSB 5545XD (5) 91
-1- as/js 1/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
b. The permit shall be on a form prescribed and published
by the commissioner of public safety, shall identify the
holder, and shall state the nature of the employment requiring
the holder to go armed. A permit so issued, other than to a
peace officer, judicial officer, county attorney, or assistant
county attorney, attorney general, deputy attorney general,
or assistant attorney general, shall authorize the person to
whom it is issued to go armed anywhere in the state, only while
engaged in the employment, and while going to and from the
place of the employment.
c. A permit issued to a certified peace officer, judicial
officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney,
attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant
attorney general shall authorize that peace officer, judicial
officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney,
attorney general, deputy attorney general, or assistant
attorney general to go armed anywhere in the state at all
times, including on the grounds of a school.
d. Permits shall expire twelve months after the date when
issued except that permits issued to peace officers, judicial
officers, county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, the
attorney general, deputy attorneys general, assistant attorneys
general, and correctional officers are valid through the
holder of the permit’s period of employment unless otherwise
canceled. When the employment is terminated, the holder of the
permit shall surrender it the permit to the issuing officer for
cancellation.
Sec. 4. Section 724.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. e. Notwithstanding any other provision in
this section, a person issued a permit to carry weapons under
this section may carry weapons only in a concealed manner when
inside a courtroom. This paragraph does not apply to peace
officers or correctional officers when fulfilling their duties
LSB 5545XD (5) 91
-2- as/js 2/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
of employment.
Sec. 5. Section 724.6, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. For purposes of this section, “emergency medical care
provider”:
a. “Emergency medical care provider” means the same as
defined in section 147A.1.
b. “Judicial officer” means the same as defined in section
602.1101.
Sec. 6. Section 724.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. The supreme court may by rule impose
additional training or other requirements on judicial officers
who hold a permit issued under this section.
DIVISION II
THREATS AGAINST A JUDICIAL OFFICER OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY
MEMBER OF A JUDICIAL OFFICER
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 708.17 Threatening a judicial officer
or an immediate family member of a judicial officer.
1. No person shall threaten a judicial officer or the
immediate family member of a judicial officer with the intent
to do any of the following:
a. Place the judicial officer or the immediate family member
of a judicial officer in fear of serious injury to the judicial
officer or the immediate family member of the judicial officer.
b. Prevent or interrupt the ability of the judicial officer
to carry out the judicial officer’s job duties.
c. Retaliate against a judicial officer in relation to the
performance of the judicial officer’s official duties during
the judicial officer’s term of service.
2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is
guilty of a class “C” felony.
3. As used in this section:
a. “Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling,
parent, grandparent, or grandchild, and includes a stepparent,
LSB 5545XD (5) 91
-3- as/js 3/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a stepchild, a stepsibling, or an adoptive relationship.
b. “Judicial officer” means the same as defined in section
602.1101.
c. “Retaliate” means intentionally threatening bodily injury
to or damage to the property of a judicial officer with intent
to retaliate against the judicial officer for the judicial
officer’s exercise of judicial duties and causing the judicial
officer or the family member to reasonably believe that the
judicial officer’s or the family member’s person or property
is in danger.
DIVISION III
MALICIOUS SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Sec. 8. NEW SECTION. 708.18 Malicious sharing of personal
information of a judicial officer or an immediate family member
of a judicial officer.
1. No person shall share the personal information of a
judicial officer or the immediate family member of a judicial
officer with the intent to do any of the following:
a. Cause harm to the judicial officer or the immediate
family member of a judicial officer.
b. Place the judicial officer or the immediate family member
of a judicial officer in fear of serious harm to the judicial
officer or to an immediate family member of the judicial
officer.
c. Prevent or interrupt the ability to carry out the
judicial officer’s job duties.
2. A person who violates the provisions of this section is
guilty of a serious misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section:
a. “Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling,
parent, grandparent, or grandchild, and includes a stepparent,
a stepchild, a stepsibling, or an adoptive relationship.
b. “Judicial officer” means the same as defined in section
602.1101.
c. “Personal information” means a person’s personal physical
LSB 5545XD (5) 91
-4- as/js 4/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
address, personal phone number, or physical location.